src-fst-morphology-affixes-adjectives.lexc.md
* Adjective singular partitive ä poss ään examples:*
* *hölöä:* `hölö+A+Sg+Par`
* *hölöään:* `hölö+A+Sg+Par+PxSg3`

* Adjective singular partitive ta examples:*
* *vapaata:* `vapaa+A+Sg+Par`

* Adjective singular partitive tä examples:*
* *pientä:* `pieni+A+Sg+Par`

* Adjective singular illative han examples:*
* *peeaahan:* `peeaa+A+Sg+Ill`

* Adjective singular illative hin examples:*
* *gayhin:* `gay+A+Sg+Ill`

* Adjective singular illative hun examples:*
* *muuhun:* `muu+A+Sg+Ill`

* Adjective singular illative hyn examples:*
* *gayhynpä:* `gay+A+Sg+Ill+Foc/pa`

* Adjective singular illative hän examples:*
* *syypäähän:* `syypää+A+Sg+Ill`

* Adjective singular illative seen back examples:*
* *vapaaseen:* `vapaa+A+Sg+Ill`

* Adjective singular illative seen front examples:*
* *työlääseen:* `työläs+A+Sg+Ill`

* Adjective singular illative an examples:*
* *rumaan:* `ruma+A+Sg+Ill`

* Adjective singular illative en back examples:*
* *suureen:* `suuri+A+Sg+Ill`

* Adjective singular illative en front examples:*
* *pieneen:* `pieni+A+Sg+Ill`

* Adjective singular illative in back examples:*
* *tuhtiin:* `tuhti+A+Sg+Ill`

* Adjective singular illative in front examples:*
* *rehtiin:* `rehti+A+Sg+Ill`

* Adjective singular illative on examples:*
* *huonoon:* `huono+A+Sg+Ill`

* Adjective singular illative un examples:*
* *fiksuun:* `fiksu+A+Sg+Ill`

* Adjective singular illative yn examples:*
* *häijyyn:* `häijy+A+Sg+Ill`

* Adjective singular illative än examples:*
* *tyhmään:* `tyhmä+A+Sg+Ill`

* Adjective singular illative ön examples:*
* *hölmöön:* `hölmö+A+Sg+Ill`

* Adjective plural partitive ia examples:*
* *rumia:* `ruma+A+Pl+Par`

* Adjective plural partitive iä examples:*
* *tyhmiä:* `tyhmä+A+Pl+Par`

* Adjective plural partitive ita examples:*
* *korkeita:* `korkea+A+Pl+Par`

* Adjective plural partitive itä examples:*
* *järeitä:* `järeä+A+Pl+Par`

* Adjective plural partitive ja examples:*
* *vahvoja:* `vahva+A+Pl+Par`

* Adjective plural partitive jä examples:*
* *hölmöjä:* `hölmö+A+Pl+Par`

* Adjective plural genitive iden back examples:*
* *tanakoiden:* `tanakka+A+Pl+Gen`

* Adjective plural genitive iden front examples:*
* *räväköiden:* `räväkkä+A+Pl+Gen`

* Adjective plural genitive ien back examples:*
* *rumien:* `ruma+A+Pl+Gen`

* Adjective plural genitive ien front examples:*
* *tyhmien:* `tyhmä+A+Pl+Gen`

* Adjective plural genitive itten back examples:*
* *nopeitten:* `nopea+A+Pl+Gen`

* Adjective plural genitive itten front examples:*
* *järeitten:* `järeä+A+Pl+Gen`

* Adjective plural genitive jen back examples:*
* *vahvojen:* `vahva+A+Pl+Gen`

* Adjective plural genitive jen front examples:*
* *hölmöjen:* `hölmö+A+Pl+Gen`

* Adjective plural genitive ten back examples:*
* *suurten:* `suuri+A+Pl+Gen`

* Adjective plural genitive ten front examples:*
* *pienten:* `pieni+A+Pl+Gen`

* Adjective plural genitive in back examples:*
* *rumain:* `ruma+A+Pl+Gen+Use/Rare`

* Adjective plural genitive in front examples:*
* *tyhmäin:* `tyhmä+A+Pl+Gen+Use/Rare`

* Adjective plural illative ihin bacl examples:*
* *pahoihin:* `paha+A+Pl+Ill`

* Adjective plural illative ihin front examples:*
* *hölmöihin:* `hölmö+A+Pl+Ill`

* Adjective plural illative iin back examples:*
* *punaisiin:* `punainen+A+Pl+Ill`

* Adjective plural illative iin front examples:*
* *sinisiin:* `sininen+A+Pl+Ill`

* Adjective plural illative isiin back examples:*
* *korkeisiin:* `korkea+A+Pl+Ill`

* Adjective plural illative isiin front examples:*
* *järeisiin:* `järeä+A+Pl+Ill`

* Adjective possessive back examples:*
* *tyhmäni:* `tyhmä+A+Sg+Nom+PxSg1`

* Adjective possessive front examples:*
* *rumani:* `ruma+A+Sg+Nom+PxSg1`

* Adjective possessive an examples:*
* *kieroaan:* `kiero+A+Sg+Par+PxSg3`

* Adjective possessive en back examples:*
* *rumalleen:* `ruma+A+Sg+All+PxSg3`

* Adjective possessive en front examples:*
* *tyhmälleen:* `tyhmä+A+Sg+All+PxSg3`

* Adjective possessive än examples:*
* *hölmöään:* `hölmö+A+Sg+Par+PxSg3`

* Adjective clitic back examples:*
* *rumahan:* `ruma+A+Sg+Nom+Foc/han`

* Adjective clitic front examples:*
* *tyhmähän:* `tyhmä+A+Sg+Nom+Foc/han`

Adjectives can usually be derived into sti adverbs productively

* Deadjectival adverb derivations sti examples:*
* *nopeasti* `nopea+A+Der/sti` (Eng. # fastly)

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-fin/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc)</small>

---
